Florida, session 2026, HB4105.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, and 7 and subsection
(12) of section 8 of section 3 of chapter 2000-488, Laws of
Florida, are amended to read:
Section 1. Creation; boundaries.—There is hereby created a
body corporate to be known as the Port St. Joe Port Authority
with the corporate powers to sue and be sued and with the
additional powers specified herein. Said authority shall be a
public agency for the development of commerce and the port of
Port St. Joe. The boundaries of the Port St. Joe Port Authority
shall embrace and include all of Franklin, Gadsden, Gulf, and
Liberty Counties.
Section 2. Governing Body.—
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4105 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4105 2026 Legislature
(1) The Port St. Joe Port Authority shall consist of six
(6) five (5) commissioners who shall constitute said authority.
The said six (6) five (5) members shall be appointed by the
Governor, with one (1) member who is a resident of the City of
Port St. Joe to serve as chair of the authority, two (2) members
who are residents of Gulf County, and one (1) member from each
of Franklin, Gadsden, and Liberty Counties who shall be a
resident of the respective county. from the date this act
becomes a law, the first appointments shall be three (3) for
four (4) years and two (2) for two (2) years. Thereafter All
appointments shall be for a term of four (4) years from the
expiration of the previous term and all vacancies shall be
filled by the Governor for the unexpired term. No commissioner
shall be an officer or employee of the City of Port St. Joe,
Franklin County, Gadsden County, Florida, the County of Gulf
County, Liberty County, or the State of Florida, excepting
members of the militia or notaries public. No more than two (2)
of the commissioners shall be persons who are primarily engaged
in the maritime business, and no person shall be eligible for
appointment as commissioner except freeholders of the City of
Port St. Joe or Gulf County, Florida. The commissioners
constituting the Port St. Joe Port Authority shall select one
(1) of their members as chair and the term of office of the
chair shall be two (2) years from the date of his or her
selection. The commissioners shall receive no compensation for
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4105 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4105 2026 Legislature
their services but the authority is hereby allowed travel and
other expenses which shall be paid as other expenses. Three (3)
commissioners shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of
conducting business, exercising its powers, and for all other
purposes.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the
offices and terms of all members of the authority as of the
effective date of this act shall end as of the effective date of
this act, but such members may continue to serve until a
successor in office is appointed by the Governor. In order to
provide for staggered terms, one (1) member who is a resident of
Gulf County and one (1) member who is a resident of Gadsden
County initially appointed to the authority after the effective
date of this act shall serve two (2) year terms.
Section 3. Employees.—The Port St. Joe Port Authority is
hereby empowered to employ an executive director of the
authority whose compensation shall be fixed by resolution of the
commissioners of said authority. And the said authority is
empowered to employ its own counsel, secretary, technical
experts, and such other employees, permanent and temporary, as
it may require, and it is empowered to determine the
qualifications, duties, and compensation of such employees. None
of the said employees shall be covered by any local civil
service laws now or hereafter in effect with respect to
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4105 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4105 2026 Legislature
employees of the City of Port St. Joe or Franklin County,
Gadsden County, Gulf County, or Liberty County.
Section 4. Powers.—The Port St. Joe Port Authority, as
hereby created, is hereby authorized and empowered:
(1) To own and acquire property or facilities by purchase,
lease, easement, eminent domain, gift, or transfer from the City
of Port St. Joe or from Franklin County, Gadsden County, Gulf
County, or Liberty County, the United States of America, the
State of Florida, any agencies thereof, corporations, or
individuals,
(2) To acquire, construct, maintain, and operate: port
terminal facilities; warehouses; wharves; docks; drydocks;
quays; yacht basins; bridges; ship basins; breakwaters;
foundation for shipways; fitting out docks; shipyards; marine
railways; railroads; repair shops; loading and unloading,
packaging and refrigeration facilities; and all other harbor,
port, commercial, and industrial improvements and facilities,
(3) To enter into contracts or leases with individuals,
corporations, any municipality, the State of Florida, and the
United States of America, or any other public body to operate
facilities owned or leased by said port authority,
(4) To enter into contracts for furthering the business,
operation, and maintenance of shipping facilities and harbor and
port improvements within the boundaries of the authority Gulf
County.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4105 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4105 2026 Legislature
100 Section 6. Limitation of Powers.—The Port St. Joe Port
101 Authority, as hereby created, shall have no power or authority
102 to bind or commit the City of Port St. Joe, a municipal
103 corporation, or Franklin County, Gadsden County, Gulf County, or
104 Liberty County, in any manner, directly or indirectly; and the
105 said City of Port St. Joe or Franklin County, Gadsden County,
106 Gulf County, or Liberty County shall not be liable or
107 responsible in any manner for any of the debts, liabilities,
108 obligations, acts, or omissions of the Port St. Joe Port
109 Authority or any of its officers or employees. All persons
110 dealing with the said authority are hereby charged with full
111 notice of this limitation and its powers.
112 Section 7. Appropriations from local governments City of
113 Port St. Joe and Gulf County.—The City of Port St. Joe, as well
114 as Franklin, Gadsden, Gulf, and Liberty Counties, and also Gulf
115 County are empowered to appropriate and contribute to the Port
116 St. Joe Port Authority such sums of money for the operation
117 expenses of the said authority as the commission of the said
118 city and the county commission may from year to year determine
119 through the city's and county's budgets. Such sums of money as
120 are so appropriated and contributed by the City of Port St. Joe
121 and the aforementioned counties Gulf County shall be paid to the
122 Port St. Joe Port Authority upon its requisition signed by the
123 chair and any two (2) other members thereof. The County
124 Commission of Gulf County may pledge the second gas tax or may
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4105 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4105 2026 Legislature
125 levy a millage and the City of Port St. Joe may levy a millage
126 to finance said Port St. Joe Port Authority.
127 Section 8. Minimum Charter Requirements.—
128 (12) The District's geographic boundary limitations shall
129 consist of all of Franklin, Gadsden, Gulf, and Liberty Counties
130 be the same as those of Gulf County.
131 Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4105 -01-er